Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,258
Windshield and windows; violations; penalty.

Any person owning or operating a motor vehicle in violation of section 60-6,257 shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1989, LB 155, § 3;

R.S.Supp.,1992, § 39-6,136.02;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 354.